Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1009.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1786 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1786. Required financial responsibility.* * *(e.1) Obligations upon issuance of new policy.-- An insurer who has issued a contract of motor vehicle liability insurance and knows or has reason to believe that the contract is for the purpose of providing proof of financial responsibility shall immediately notify the department that the contract has been issued. The insurer shall notify the department not later than ten days after the effective date of the policy of insurance.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.123456789101112131415161718